Alaska statutes. Title 30. Navigation, Harbors, Shipping, and Transportation Facilities.
Article 3. Projects; Bonds.

Sec. 30.17.200.
Consideration of projects to be financed.

Before issuing bonds for a project under this chapter, the authority must find, on the basis of all information reasonably available to it, that the

project and its development under this chapter will be economically advantageous to the state and the general public welfare and will contribute to the economic growth of the state;

project is financially sound and can be expected to produce revenue adequate to repay the bonds with which it is financed; and

scope of the project is sufficient to provide a reasonable expectation of a benefit to the region and the economy of the state.

The authority shall give fair and reasonable consideration to a project presented to it for financing. When the authority determines whether to finance or assist in the financing of a project, the authority shall state the reasons for its determination in a written resolution upon request by a person who presented the project to the authority or a person who presented opposition to the project. The authority shall base its reasons on the information presented to it concerning the project and on other information considered appropriate by the authority.

The authority may not issue bonds to finance or assist in financing a project unless the authority has received legislative approval to do so for a specified project.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.210.
Bonds of the authority.

Subject to the provisions of AS

30.17.200

, the authority may borrow money and may issue revenue bonds, including bonds on which the principal and interest are payable

exclusively from the income and receipts or other money derived from the project financed with the proceeds of the bonds;

exclusively from the income and receipts or other money derived from designated projects whether or not they are financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of the bonds; or

from the income and receipts or assets generally, or a designated part or parts of them, of the authority or of any other person.

Bonds issued under this chapter shall be authorized by resolution of the authority, and shall be dated and shall mature as the resolution may provide, except that a bond may not mature more than 40 years from the date of its issuance. The bonds shall bear interest at the rate or rates, be in the denominations, be in the form, either coupon or registered, carry the registration privileges, be executed in the manner, be payable in the medium of payment, at the place or places, and be subject to the terms of redemption that the resolution or a subsequent resolution may provide.

Bonds issued under this chapter, regardless of form or character, shall be negotiable instruments for the purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code.

Bonds issued under this chapter may be sold at public or private sale in the manner, for the price or prices, and at the time or times that the authority may determine.

The superior court shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine suits, actions, or proceedings relating to the authority, including suits, actions, or proceedings brought to foreclose or otherwise enforce a mortgage, pledge, assignment, or security interest or brought by or for the benefit or security of a holder of its bonds or by a trustee for or other representative of the holders.

Before issuing bonds for a project under this chapter, the authority shall submit to the state bond committee a description of the bond issue and an independent economic feasibility analysis of the project and expected revenue. This information may be contained in a preliminary prospectus, offering circular, or official statement relating to the bond issue. Bonds may not be issued under this chapter unless the state bond committee finds, based upon the information submitted by the authority under this subsection and other information that is reasonably available to the committee, that the project revenue can be reasonably expected to be adequate for payment of the principal and interest on the bonds to be issued if the bonds are to be secured by project revenue alone, and in any event that issuance of the bonds by the authority would not be expected to adversely affect the ability of the state or its political subdivisions to market bonds.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.220.
Trust indentures and trust agreements.

In the discretion of the authority, an issue of bonds may be secured by a trust indenture or trust agreement between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be a trust company, bank, or national banking association, with corporate trust powers, located inside or outside the state, or by a secured loan agreement or other instrument or under a resolution giving powers to a corporate trustee, after this in this section referred to as “trust agreement,” by means of which the authority may

make and enter into the covenants and agreements with the trustee or the holders of the bonds that the authority determines necessary or desirable, including, without limitation, covenants, provisions, limitations, and agreements as to

the application, investment, deposit, use, and disposition of the proceeds of the bonds of the authority or of money or other property of the authority or in which it has an interest;

the fixing and collection of rents or other consideration for, and the other terms to be incorporated in, an agreement with respect to a project;

the assignment by the authority of its rights in a mortgage or other security interest created with respect to a project to a trustee for benefit of bondholders;

the terms and conditions upon which additional bonds of the authority may be issued;

the vesting in a trustee of rights, powers, duties, funds, or property in trust for the benefit of bondholders, including, without limitation, the right to enforce payment, performance, and all other rights of the authority or of the bondholders under a lease, contract of sale, mortgage, security agreement, or trust agreement with respect to a project by appropriate judicial proceeding or by taking possession of by agent or otherwise and operating a project and collecting rents or other consideration and applying the same in accordance with the trust agreement;

pledge, mortgage, or assign money, leases, agreements, property, or other assets of the authority either presently in hand or to be received in the future, or both; and

provide for other matters that affect the security or protection of the bonds.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.230.
Validity of pledge.

It is the intent of the legislature that a pledge made in respect of bonds issued under this chapter is perfected, valid, and binding from the time the pledge is made; that the money or property so pledged and thereafter received by the authority is immediately subject to the lien of the pledge without physical delivery or further act; and that the lien of the pledge is valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the authority whether or not the parties have notice. Neither the resolution, trust agreement, nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded or filed under the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code to be perfected or to be valid, binding, or effective against the parties.

This section does not affect title to or conveyances of real property, and does not limit the applicability of AS

40.17.080

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.240.
Nonliability on bonds.

Neither the members of the authority nor a person executing the bonds are liable personally on the bonds issued by the authority or are subject to personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance of the bonds.

The bonds issued by the authority do not constitute an indebtedness or other liability of the state or of a political subdivision of the state, but shall be payable solely from the income and receipts or other funds or property of the authority. The authority may not pledge the faith or credit of the state or of a political subdivision of the state, except the authority, to the payment of a bond, and the issuance of a bond by the authority does not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the state or a political subdivision of the state to apply money from, levy, or pledge any form of taxation to the payment of the bond.

The authority shall print the language of (b) of this section in substantial form on the face of all bonds issued and in any offering circular, or statement issued in connection with the bonds.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.250.
Pledge of the state.

The state pledges to and agrees with the holders of bonds issued under this chapter and with the federal agency that loans or contributes funds in respect to a project, that the state will not limit or alter the rights and powers vested in the authority by this chapter to fulfill the terms of a contract made by the authority with the holders or federal agency, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders until the bonds, together with the interest on them with interest on unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with an action or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders, are fully met and discharged. The authority may include this pledge and agreement of the state, insofar as it refers to holders of bonds of the authority, in a contract with the holders, and insofar as it relates to a federal agency, in a contract with the federal agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.260.
Exemption from taxation.

The real and personal property of the authority and its assets, income, and receipts are declared to be the property of a political subdivision of the state and are exempt from taxes and special assessments of the state or a political subdivision of the state. Bonds of the authority are declared to be issued by a political subdivision of the state and for an essential public and governmental purpose and to be a public instrumentality, and the bonds, the interest on them, the income from them, and the transfer of the bonds, and all assets, income, and receipts pledged to pay or secure the payment of the bonds or interest on them shall at all times be exempt from taxation by or under the authority of the state, except for inheritance and estate taxes and taxes on transfers by or in contemplation of death.

This section does not affect or limit an exemption from license fees, property taxes, or excise, income, or other taxes, provided under any other law, nor does it create a tax exemption with respect to the interest of any business enterprise or other person, other than the authority, in any property, assets, income, receipts, project, or lease whether or not financed under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.270.
Bonds legal investments for fiduciaries.

The bonds of the authority are securities in which public officers and bodies of the state; municipalities and municipal subdivisions; insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business; banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks, savings associations, including savings and loan associations and building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on banking business; administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries; and other persons who are now or may afterward be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state, may properly and legally invest money, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the bonds of the authority are also securities that may be deposited with and may be received by public officers and bodies of the state and municipalities and municipal subdivisions for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the state is now or may afterward be authorized.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)

Sec. 30.17.280.
Enterprise development account.

The enterprise development account is established in the authority. The enterprise development account is a trust fund for the uses and purposes of this chapter. The enterprise development account consists of money or assets appropriated or transferred to the authority and other money or assets deposited in it by the authority.

The authority may establish in the enterprise development account the accounts it considers appropriate.

Money and other assets of the enterprise development account may be used to secure bonds of the authority issued to finance the purchase of loans for projects or may be used to purchase participation in the loans for projects.

A loan participation purchased by the authority with assets of the enterprise development account or with proceeds of bonds secured by assets of the enterprise development account

may not be purchased unless

the project applicant is not, or, if the applicant is not a single proprietorship, all members of the business enterprise or enterprises constituting the project applicant are not, in default on another loan made by the state or by a public corporation of the state;

the project applicant has, or, if the applicant is not a single proprietorship, all members of the business enterprise or enterprises constituting the project applicant have, paid all taxes due to the state, has satisfied financial requirements for state tax cases that are under appeal, and is current on all payment schedules relating to state taxes or settlement of tax disputes with the state; and

at least 20 percent of the principal amount of the loan is retained by the loan originator;

may not be purchased if the loan to be purchased exceeds the cost of the project or 75 percent of the appraised value of the project, whichever is less, unless the amount of the loan in excess of this limit is federally insured or guaranteed or is insured by a qualified mortgage insurance company;

may not be purchased if the participation in the loan to be purchased is for a term longer than three-quarters of the authority’s estimate of the life of the project or 25 years from the date the loan is made, whichever is earlier; however, in the case of a loan participation for a power transmission intertie, the term may not be longer than 50 years from the date the loan is made;

may be made only if the participation in the loan to be purchased contains amortization provisions; the amortization provisions

must be complete and satisfactory to the authority and require periodic payments by the borrower;

may allow the loan originator to amortize the portion of the loan retained by the loan originator using a shorter amortization schedule than the amortization schedule for the portion of the loan held by the authority if

in the authority’s opinion, the project financed can support the increased debt service; and

the accelerated amortization schedule is required to induce the originator to make the loan;

may be made only if the participation in the loan to be purchased is in the form and contains the terms and provisions with respect to insurance, repairs, alterations, payment of taxes and assessments, default reserves, delinquency charges, default remedies, acceleration of maturity, secondary liens, and other matters the authority prescribes; and

may be made only if the participation in the loan to be purchased is secured as to repayment by a mortgage or other security instrument in the manner the authority determines is feasible to assure timely repayment under a loan agreement entered into with the borrower.

The authority may adopt regulations for the administration of the enterprise development account including provisions for fees and agreements relating to application, loan commitment, servicing, and origination of loans by other lenders.

The authority may enter into agreements as to the use of the money in the enterprise development account including trust or custody arrangements with banks or trust companies. It may also pledge, assign, or grant the agreement, interests under an agreement, or interests in the enterprise development account as may be necessary or appropriate to provide for payment and security for bonds of the authority issued to finance the purchase by the authority of loans for projects.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the authority may waive or modify the requirements of this section as it considers appropriate and prudent in order to finance a project if the authority intends to own the project or in order to finance a power transmission intertie project.

The provisions of this section apply only with respect to a loan participation purchased by the authority for projects under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1996)